Tennessee, session 114, SB1361.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-728(c), is amended by deleting
"December 1" and substituting instead "January 1".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1361
003383
- 1 -